Mississippi, session 2026, HB1497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Protect our Hunting Dogs Act". SECTION 2. (1)  The Legislature finds that: (a)  Lawfully used hunting dogs are valuable working animals and personal property throughout the State of Mississippi. (b)  The intentional killing or harming of hunting dogs undermines lawful hunting traditions, public safety, and animal welfare. (c)  Uniform statewide standards are necessary to protect both private property rights and responsible hunting practices. (2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that this act apply uniformly across all counties, municipalities, and jurisdictions within the State of Mississippi, without exception. SECTION 3. For purposes of this act, the following words shall have the meanings described herein: (a)  "Hunting dog" means a dog lawfully used for hunting, tracking, locating, or recovering game, including bird dogs, hounds, retrievers, and tracking dogs. (b) "Handler" means the owner or person lawfully responsible for the control of a hunting dog. (c) "Retrieve" means the act of locating and removing a hunting dog from property not owned or controlled by the handler. SECTION 4.  (1) It shall be unlawful anywhere within the State of Mississippi for any person to knowingly, intentionally, or maliciously kill or cause serious bodily injury to a hunting dog without legal justification. (2)  A violation of this act shall constitute a felony, punishable by: (a)  Imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, (b)  A fine of not more than Ten Thousand Dollars      ($10,000.00), or (c)  Both. (3)  Upon conviction, the court shall order mandatory restitution, including, but not limited to: (a)  Veterinary costs, (b)  Replacement value of the dog, (c)  Training and breeding costs, and (d)  Any related economic losses. (4)  This section does not apply to lawful self defense where a hunting dog poses an immediate and credible threat of serious bodily harm. SECTION 5. (1)  A handler shall have a limited statewide right to retrieve a hunting dog that unintentionally strays onto private property, provided the handler complies with all of the following: (a)  The handler shall not carry a firearm or weapon during retrieval. (b)  The handler shall make reasonable efforts to notify the landowner or occupant prior to entry when practicable. (c)  Entry shall be limited solely to retrieving the dog and shall not include hunting, chasing game, or remaining on the property longer than reasonably necessary. (d)  The handler shall cause no damage to crops, fences, gates, livestock, or other property. (2)  This section does not authorize: (a)  Hunting or scouting on private property, (b)  Use of motorized vehicles without permission, or (c)  Entry onto posted property where retrieval has been expressly denied and reasonable alternatives exist. (3)  A handler who violates this section may be prosecuted under existing criminal trespass statutes. SECTION 6.  A handler who enters property solely for lawful retrieval in compliance with this act shall not be civilly liable for trespass where no damage occurs. SECTION 7. This act shall preempt any local ordinance, regulation, or policy that conflicts with or attempts to restrict the protections or retrieval rights established herein. SECTION 8.  If any provision of this act is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect the remaining provisions. SECTION 9.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.